Utah statutes.
69-3-3.   Use of sites.

The state, county, city, or town after acquiring a site shall permit the public use of such site subject to the following conditions:

(1)  the facilities and access roads are designed and constructed so as to minimally disturb the natural terrain;

(2)  the owner of any tower on such site agrees to accommodate the multiple use of the tower where feasible; and

(3)  the owner of any tower agrees to pay to the state, county, city, or town, as the case may be, the fair market rental value for the use of the site.



Enacted by Chapter 95, 1986 General Session

